test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-looja_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - lǭja: # Noun 23 'eng /est paat/fin' - full paradigm
     lǭja+N+Sg+Nom: [lǭja, lōja]
     lǭja+N+Sg+Gen: [lǭja, lōja]
     lǭja+N+Sg+Par: laijõ
     lǭja+N+Sg+Dat: [lǭjan, lōjan]
     lǭja+N+Sg+Ins: [lǭjaks, lōjaks]
     lǭja+N+Sg+Ill: laijõ
     lǭja+N+Sg+Ela: [lǭjast, lōjast]
     lǭja+N+Pl+Nom: [lǭjad, lōjad]
     lǭja+N+Pl+Gen: [lǭjad, lōjad]
     lǭja+N+Pl+Par: laijḑi
     lǭja+N+Pl+Dat: [lǭjadõn, lōjadõn]
     lǭja+N+Pl+Ins: [lǭjadõks, lōjadõks]
     lǭja+N+Pl+Ill: laijži
     lǭja+N+Pl+Ela: laijšti
